Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 2
CHALLENGES TO VOTING

1-9-201. Right to vote may be challenged.

A person's right to vote at a polling location or in an election may be challenged on one or more of the following grounds:

The person is not a citizen of the United States;

The person has not resided in the state for twenty-two days immediately preceding the election;

The person will not be eighteen years of age or older on or before election day; or

If being a property owner or the spouse or civil union partner of a property owner is required for the election, the person is not a property owner or the spouse or civil union partner of a property owner.

If a person whose right to vote is challenged at a polling location refuses to answer the questions asked or sign the challenge form in accordance with section 1-9-203, the person shall be offered a provisional ballot. If the person casts a provisional ballot, the election judge shall attach the challenge form to the provisional ballot envelope and indicate "Challenge" on the provisional ballot envelope.

An election judge shall challenge any person intending to vote who the judge believes is not an eligible elector as provided in subsection (1)(a) of this section. In addition, challenges may be made by watchers or any eligible elector of the precinct as provided in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

A challenge at a polling location shall be made in the presence of the person whose right to vote is challenged.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 381, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire article amended, p. 772, § 12, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1419, § 40, effective June 6; entire section amended, p. 1454, § 40, effective June 6.

L. 2013:

(1) and (3) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 746, § 112, effective May 10.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1651, § 42, effective June 21.

L. 2022:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2964, § 4, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-8-102 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsections (1) and (3) were amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-9-202. Challenge to be made by written oath.

Each challenge must be made by written oath on a form provided by an election judge. The form must include a space for the name of the person challenged and the specific factual basis for the challenge of the person's right to vote as set forth in section 1-9-201 (1)(a) and must be signed by the challenger under penalty of perjury in the second degree, as specified in section 1-13-104. The election judges shall forthwith deliver all challenges to the designated election official. No oral challenge is permitted.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 381, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire article amended, p. 773, § 12, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1420, § 41, effective June 6; entire section amended, p. 1455, § 41, effective June 6.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1651, § 43, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-8-103 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

For oaths and affirmations generally, see article 12 of title 24.

1-9-203. Challenge questions asked person intending to vote.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2005, pp. 1420, 1455, §§ 42, 42, effective June 6, 2005.)

If the person is challenged as not eligible because the person is not a citizen, an election judge shall ask the following question:

Are you a citizen of the United States?

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 1432, § 109, effective July 1, 1993.)

If the person is challenged as not eligible because the person has not resided in this state for twenty-two days immediately preceding the election, an election judge shall ask the following questions:

Have you resided in this state for the twenty-two days immediately preceding this election?

Have you been absent from this state during the twenty-two days immediately preceding this election, and during that time have you maintained a home or domicile elsewhere?

If so, when you left, was it for a temporary purpose with the intent of returning, or did you intend to remain away?

Did you, while absent, look upon and regard this state as your home?

Did you, while absent, vote in any other state or any territory of the United States?

If the person is challenged as not eligible to vote in an election other than a primary election because the person will not be eighteen years of age or older on or before election day, an election judge shall ask the following question: To the best of your knowledge and belief, will you be eighteen years of age or older on election day?

If the person is challenged as not eligible to vote in a primary election because the person will not be eighteen years of age on or before the date of the next general election, an election judge shall ask the following question: To the best of your knowledge and belief, are you at least seventeen years of age and will you be at least eighteen years of age on or before the date of the next general election?

If the person is challenged as not eligible because the person is not a property owner or the spouse or civil union partner of a property owner, an election judge shall ask the following questions:

Are you a property owner or the spouse or civil union partner of a property owner in this political subdivision and therefore eligible to vote?

What is the address or, for special district elections where an address is not available, the location of the property which entitles you to vote in this election?

Repealed.

If the person challenged answers satisfactorily the questions asked in accordance with this section, the election judge shall offer the person challenged a regular ballot, and the challenger may withdraw the challenge. The election judge shall indicate in the proper place on the challenge form whether the challenge was withdrawn or whether the challenged elector refused to answer the questions and left the polling location without voting a provisional ballot.

Only an election judge or election judge supervisor shall ask the questions required by this section and complete the form as required by subsection (7) of this section. If the challenger is an election judge or election judge supervisor, a different election judge or election judge supervisor shall ask the questions and complete the form as required by this section.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 382, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 637, § 77, effective May 1.

L. 92:

Entire article amended, p. 773, § 12, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(2) and (5)(b) amended, p. 1432, § 109, effective July 1.

L. 94:

IP(3), (3)(a), and (3)(b) amended, p. 1771, § 32, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(3)(b) amended, p. 843, § 66, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1) and (7) amended, p. 1420, § 42, effective June 6; (1) and (7) amended, p. 1455, § 42, effective June 6.

L. 2013:

IP(5), (5)(a), and (7) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 746, § 113, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

IP(3), (3)(a), (3)(b), and (4) amended, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 566, § 24, effective May 9.

L. 2019:

(4) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3033, § 43, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(6) repealed and (8) added, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1651, § 44, effective June 21.

L. 2022:

(7) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2964, § 5, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-8-104 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

(1) For oaths and affirmations generally, see article 12 of title 24.

(2) In 2013, the introductory portion to subsection (5) and subsections (5)(a) and (7) were amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(3) For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-9-204. Oath of challenged elector. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 383, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 638, § 78, effective May 1.

L. 92:

Entire article amended, p. 774, § 12, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1771, § 33, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1763, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 778, § 64, effective May 20.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1420, § 43, effective June 6; entire section amended, p. 1455, § 43, effective June 6.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 747, § 114, effective May 10.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3033, § 44, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

Entire section repealed, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1672, § 83, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 1-8-105 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-9-205. Refusal to answer questions or take oath. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 383, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire article amended, p. 774, § 12, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 1425, § 56, effective June 6; entire section repealed, p. 1461, § 56, effective June 6.

1-9-206. Challenges of absentee ballots. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 383, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire article amended, p. 775, § 12, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1432, § 110, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1636, § 21, effective June 7.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1420, § 44, effective June 6; entire section amended, p. 1456, § 44, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

Entire section repealed, p. 1795, § 57, effective June 1.

1-9-207. Challenges of ballots cast by mail.

The ballot of any elector that has been cast by mail may be challenged using a challenge form signed by the challenger under penalty of perjury setting forth the name of the person challenged and the basis for the challenge. Challenged ballots, except those rejected for forgery of a deceased person's signature on a mail ballot affidavit or submission of multiple ballots, must be counted. The election judges shall forthwith deliver all challenges, together with the affidavits of the persons challenged, to the county clerk and recorder or designated election official, as applicable.

A mail ballot may not be challenged under this section solely on the basis of the signature that appears on the mail ballot. Signatures on mail ballots must be reviewed in accordance with section 1-7.5-107.3.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1169, § 46, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1636, § 22, effective June 7.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1421, § 45, effective June 6; entire section amended, p. 1456, § 45, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1795, § 58, effective June 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1651, § 45, effective June 21.

1-9-208. Challenges of provisional ballots.

The ballot of any provisional voter may be challenged using a challenge form signed by the challenger under penalty of perjury setting forth the name of the person challenged and the basis for the challenge. Challenged provisional ballots, except those rejected for submission of multiple ballots, must be counted if the other requirements for counting provisional ballots are satisfied. The election judges shall deliver all challenges, together with the affidavits of the persons challenged, to the county clerk and recorder or the designated election official.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1636, § 23, effective June 7.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1421, § 46, effective June 6; entire section amended, p. 1456, § 46, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1796, § 59, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 747, § 115, effective May 10.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1652, § 46, effective June 21.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-9-209. Challenges delivered to district attorney.

The county clerk and recorder or designated election official shall forthwith deliver a challenge that is not withdrawn, along with the affidavit of the elector on the mail-in, provisional ballot, or mail ballot return envelope, to the district attorney for investigation and action. When practicable, the district attorney shall complete the investigation within ten days after receiving the challenge.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1421, § 47, effective June 6; entire section added, p. 1457, § 47, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1796, § 60, effective June 1.

1-9-210. Copy of challenge delivered to elector.

When a challenge is made to a person who cast a mail ballot or provisional ballot and the person was not present at the time of the challenge, the county clerk and recorder or designated election official shall notify and mail a copy of the challenge to the person challenged in accordance with the rules of the secretary of state.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1422, § 47, effective June 6; entire section added, p. 1457, § 47, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1796, § 61, effective June 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 74, § 42, effective February 18.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.